Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6285.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 222. As used in this chapter: (a) "Alcoholic liquor" means that term as defined in section 105 of the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1105. (b) "Barrel length" means the internal length of a firearm as measured from the face of the closed breech of the firearm when it is unloaded, to the forward face of the end of the barrel. (c) "Brandish" means to point, wave about, or display in a threatening manner with the intent to induce fear in another person. (d) "Controlled substance" means a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue as those terms are defined in section 7104 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7104. (e) "Firearm" means any weapon which will, is designed to, or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by action of an explosive. (f) "Pistol" means a loaded or unloaded firearm that is 26 inches or less in length, or a loaded or unloaded firearm that by its construction and appearance conceals itself as a firearm. (g) "Pneumatic gun" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1990 PA 319, MCL 123.1101. (h) "Purchaser" means a person who receives a pistol from another person by purchase, gift, or loan. (i) "Rifle" means a firearm designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger. (j) "Seller" means a person who sells, furnishes, loans, or gives a pistol to another person. (k) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having 1 or more barrels less than 16 inches in length or a weapon made from a rifle, whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise, if the weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 26 inches. (l) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having 1 or more barrels less than 18 inches in length or a weapon made from a shotgun, whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise, if the weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 26 inches. (k) (m) "Shotgun" means a firearm designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single function of the trigger. Sec. 224. (1) A person shall not manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or possess any of the following: (a) A machine gun or firearm that shoots or is designed to shoot automatically more than 1 shot without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger. (b) A muffler or silencer. (b) (c) A bomb or bombshell. (c) (d) A blackjack, slungshot, billy, metallic knuckles, sand club, sand bag, or bludgeon. (d) (e) A device, weapon, cartridge, container, or contrivance designed to render a person temporarily or permanently disabled by the ejection, release, or emission of a gas or other substance. (2) A person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (3) Subsection (1) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A self-defense spray or foam device as defined in section 224d. (b) A person manufacturing firearms, explosives, or munitions of war by virtue of a contract with a department of the government of the United States. (c) A person licensed by the secretary of the treasury of the United States or the secretary's delegate to manufacture, sell, or possess a machine gun, or a device, weapon, cartridge, container, or contrivance described in subsection (1). (4) As used in this chapter, "muffler" or "silencer" means 1 or more of the following: (a) A device for muffling, silencing, or deadening the report of a firearm. (b) A combination of parts, designed or redesigned, and intended for use in assembling or fabricating a muffler or silencer. (c) A part, designed or redesigned, and intended only for use in assembling or fabricating a muffler or silencer. Sec. 231. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), sections 224, 224a, 224b, 224d, 227, 227c, and 227d do not apply to any of the following: (a) A peace officer of an authorized police agency of the United States, of this state, or of a political subdivision of this state, who is regularly employed and paid by the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state. (b) A person who is regularly employed by the state department of corrections and who is authorized in writing by the director of the department of corrections to carry a concealed weapon while in the official performance of his or her duties or while going to or returning from those duties. (c) A person employed by a private vendor that operates a youth correctional facility authorized under section 20g of the corrections code of 1953, 1953 PA 232, MCL 791.220g, who meets the same criteria established by the director of the state department of corrections for departmental employees described in subdivision (b) and who is authorized in writing by the director of the department of corrections to carry a concealed weapon while in the official performance of his or her duties or while going to or returning from those duties. (d) A member of the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, or Marine Corps or the United States Coast Guard while carrying weapons in the line of or incidental to duty. (e) An organization authorized by law to purchase or receive weapons from the United States or from this state. (f) A member of the National Guard, United States Armed Forces Reserve, the United States Coast Guard Reserve, or any other authorized military organization while on duty or drill, or in going to or returning from a place of assembly or practice, while carrying weapons used for a purpose of the National Guard, United States Armed Forces Reserve, United States Coast Guard Reserve, or other duly authorized military organization. (g) A security employee employed by the state and granted limited arrest powers under section 6c of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.6c. (h) A motor carrier officer appointed under section 6d of 1935 PA 59, MCL 28.6d. (2) As applied to section 224a(1) only, subsection (1) is not applicable to an individual included under subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) unless he or she has been trained on the use, effects, and risks of using a portable device or weapon described in section 224a(1). Enacting section 1. Section 224b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.224b, is repealed.